Arkansas, session 2025, SB418.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 11-9-408, concerning insurance policies
under the Workers' Compensation Law, is amended to add an additional
subsection to read as follows:
(e)(1) An insurer providing workers' compensation benefits in this
state is required to have a medical loss ratio of at least eighty-five
percent (85%) for workers compensation claims.
(2) As used in this section, "medical loss ratio" means the
measure used in workers' compensation insurance to assess the percentage of
premium dollars spent on healthcare claims and wage claims versus
administrative costs.
*ANS354*
03/10/2025 3:09:11 PM ANS354